Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1839.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Financial aid trust fund; required state match; reduction Notwithstanding section 15-1642, subsection C, Arizona Revised Statutes, for fiscal year 2026-2027, each dollar raised pursuant to the surcharge on student registration fees assessed pursuant to section 15-1642, subsection A, Arizona Revised Statutes, may be matched by less than $2 appropriated by the legislature. Sec. 2. Community college districts; state aid for science, technology, engineering and mathematics and workforce programs Notwithstanding section 15-1464, subsection A, paragraph 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, state aid for science, technology, engineering and mathematics and workforce programs for community college districts for fiscal year 2026-2027 is as specified in the general appropriations act. Sec. 3. Community college districts; operating state aid; eligibility; limits Notwithstanding section 15-1466, Arizona Revised Statutes, operating state aid for community college districts for fiscal year 2026-2027 is as specified in the general appropriations act.